Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.404

Fish enhancement project—City's or town's liability.

A city or town is not liable for adverse impacts resulting from a fish enhancement project that meets the criteria of RCW 77.55.181 and has been permitted by the department of fish and wildlife.

[ 2014 c 120 s 9; 2003 c 39 s 14; 1998 c 249 s 9.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Report—Effective date—1998 c 249: See notes following RCW 77.55.181.